Utah statutes.
59-12-701.   Purpose statement.

The Utah Legislature finds and declares that:

(1)  Recreational and zoological facilities and the botanical, cultural, and zoological organizations of the state of Utah enhance the quality of life of Utah's citizens, as well as the continuing growth of Utah's tourist, convention, and recreational industries.

(2)  Utah was the first state in this nation to create and financially support a state arts agency, now the Utah Arts Council, which is committed to the nurturing and growth of cultural pursuits.

(3)  Utah has provided, and intends to continue, the financial support of recreational and zoological facilities and the botanical, cultural, and zoological organizations of this state.

(4)  The state's support of its recreational and zoological facilities and its botanical, cultural, and zoological organizations has not been sufficient to assure the continuing existence and growth of these facilities and organizations, and the Legislature believes that local government may wish to play a greater role in the support of these organizations.

(5)  Without jeopardizing the state's ongoing support of its recreational and zoological facilities and its botanical, cultural, and zoological organizations, the Legislature intends to permit the counties of the state of Utah to enhance public financial support of Utah's publicly owned or operated recreational and zoological facilities, and botanical, cultural, and zoological organizations owned or operated by institutions or private nonprofit organizations, through the imposition of a county sales and use tax.

(6)  In a county of the first class, it is necessary and appropriate to allocate a tax imposed under this part in a manner that provides adequate predictable support to a fixed number of botanical and cultural organizations and that gives the county legislative body discretion to allocate the tax revenues to other botanical and cultural organizations.

